Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 5 Department of Transportation

37-5-1.
Roads subject to supervision of department.

The department and director of transportation shall enforce the provisions of chapters 8 and 10 of title 24, all other provisions of the general laws and public laws relating to the care and maintenance of highways, roads, freeways, and bridges by the state, including the construction, reconstruction, care, and maintenance of park roads and parkways previously performed by the department of agriculture and conservation, and roads and driveways on the grounds of the university of Rhode Island, the Rhode Island college, the several state institutions, and other state property, unless otherwise provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 102; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-5-1

; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44.

37-5-2.
Maintenance and construction of roads — Regulation of use — Cooperation with other agencies.

The department shall maintain and construct highways, roads, freeways, bridges, and incidental structures, and shall make rules and regulations regarding the use of highways, roads, freeways, bridges, and structures. The department shall cooperate with the several cities and towns in the construction of highways, roads, freeways, and bridges, and with the federal government on federal aid projects. Whenever a public utility files an application with the department for permission to excavate a state maintained road in order to extend its service, the department shall send a notice by certified mail to the town or city clerk of the municipality in which the excavation is to take place.

Any contractor hired by the department to perform work shall notify a city or town that a subcontractor has been hired by the contractor to perform work in that city or town. The notification shall include the name and address of each contractor and subcontractor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 103; G.L. 1956, §

37-5-2

; P.L. 1995, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 296, § 1.

37-5-3.
Airports and aeronautics.

The department and director shall have supervision over the state airport at Hillsgrove, such other airports and landing fields as may be constructed or operated by the state, and all other aeronautics within the state, and shall enforce the provisions of chapters 2 and 4 of title 1.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 106; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

37-5-3

.

37-5-4.
State piers — Cooperation in river and harbor development.

The department and director shall have jurisdiction over state pier no. 1 at Providence, state pier no. 2 at Pawtucket, and state piers no. 3 and no. 4 in the town of Narragansett. The department shall also cooperate with federal authorities in connection with river and harbor development; and shall also carry on all duties in connection with the opening of breachways in the several salt ponds of the state and for this purpose shall cooperate with federal authorities in connection with the breachways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 107; G.L. 1956, §

37-5-4

.

37-5-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 108; G.L. 1956, §

37-5-5

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 15, § 4, effective June 30, 2015.

37-5-6.
Emergency public works powers.

The department and director shall exercise and perform all the powers, duties, and functions now or formerly exercised or performed by the emergency public works commission, with the exception of the award of contracts for new buildings, which contracts shall be awarded by the department of administration, and the emergency public works commission is hereby abolished.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 110; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-5-6

.

37-5-7.
Commuter parking facilities.

The department and director are authorized to plan, construct, and maintain, or to enter into agreements with federal, state, or local governmental agencies in connection with commuter parking facilities at locations which would encourage the use of mass transportation and reduce peak traffic demands on highway systems. The provisions of the agreements may be carried out by the director with other governmental agencies as necessity, convenience, or economy requires. The director shall have authority to enter into agreements with federal agencies for federal financial aid and to do any and all other acts and things necessary or desirable to take advantage of the financial aid. Contracts for the construction shall be carried out in the manner provided by law for public works. The director may acquire in the name of the state such real property as is necessary to construct and maintain commuter parking facilities in the same manner and with like powers as authorized and exercised by the director in acquiring real property for state highway purposes in accordance with chapter 6 of title 37.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 52, § 1.

37-5-7.1.
Parking cash-out programs.

Each employer of fifty (50) persons or more, located within one-quarter (1/4) of a mile of Rhode Island public transit service who provides a parking subsidy to employees, shall offer a parking cash-out program. “Parking cash-out program” means an employer-funded program under which an employer offers to provide a RIPTA monthly transit pass to an employee instead of the parking subsidy that the employer would otherwise pay to provide the employee with a parking space.

A parking cash-out program may include a requirement that employee participants certify that they will comply with guidelines established by the employer designed to avoid neighborhood parking problems, with a provision that employees not complying with the guidelines will no longer be eligible for the parking cash-out program.

As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

“Employee” means an employee of an employer subject to this section;

“Parking subsidy” means the difference between the out-of-pocket amount paid by an employer on a regular basis in order to secure the availability of an employee parking space not owned by the employer and the price, if any, charged to an employee for use of that space.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to any employer who, on or before August 1, 2003, has leased employee parking, until the expiration of that lease or unless the lease permits the employer to reduce, without penalty, the number of parking spaces subject to the lease.

It is the intent of the general assembly, in enacting this section, that cash-out requirements shall apply only to employers who can reduce, without penalty, the number of paid parking spaces they maintain for the use of their employees and instead provide their employees the monthly transit pass described in this section.

Any city or town in which a commercial development will implement a parking cash-out program may grant to that development an appropriate reduction in the parking requirements otherwise in effect for new development. At the request of an existing commercial development that has implemented a parking cash-out program, the city or town may grant an appropriate reduction in the parking requirements otherwise applicable, based on the demonstrated reduced need for parking, and the space no longer needed for parking purposes may be used for other appropriate purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 315, § 1.